Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1207.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1368.2 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 1368.2. Special plates for recipients of Presidential Service Badge.Upon application of any person who is a recipient of the Presidential Service Badge, accompanied by a fee of [$20] $28 which shall be in addition to the registration fee and by such documentation as the department shall require, the department shall issue to the person a special registration plate designating the vehicle so licensed as belonging to a person who is a recipient of the Presidential Service Badge. The special registration plate may be used only on a passenger car or truck with a registered gross weight of not more than 14,000 pounds.1234567891011121314151617181920 Section 2. Title 75 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1368.5. Special plates for recipients of Vice Presidential Service Badge.Upon application of any person who is a recipient of the Vice Presidential Service Badge, accompanied by a fee of $28 which shall be in addition to the registration fee and by such documentation as the department shall require, the department shall issue to the person a special registration plate designating the vehicle so licensed as belonging to a person who is a recipient of the Vice Presidential Service Badge. The special registration plate may be used only on a passenger car or truck with a registered gross weight of not more than 14,000 pounds.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 120 days.20260SB1207PN1484 - 2 - 1234567891011121314